Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 19

Department of Revenue

4-3-1901. Creation — Organization.

There is hereby created the department of revenue.

The commissioner of revenue shall determine the organization of and the methods of procedure within the department that are deemed suitable or necessary to exercise the powers conferred and perform the duties imposed by law and shall appoint, in accordance with applicable personnel guidelines and budgetary limitations, such assistants as are deemed necessary to effectively discharge the duties of the office in an orderly and efficient manner.

Acts 1921, ch. 113, § 3; 1923, ch. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., §§ 373a30, 809a10; mod. Code 1932, §§ 255, 1479; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.1; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; modified; Acts 1963, ch. 99, § 1; 1973, ch. 368, § 2; 1978, ch. 599, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 67-104.

Compiler's Notes. The department of revenue, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of revenue, §4-3-101.

4-3-1902. Commissioner.

The department of revenue shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of revenue.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 373a32; Code 1932, § 257; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.2; Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; modified.

Cross-References. General organization, powers and duties of department, title 67, ch. 1, part 1.

Increment of taxes resulting from construction of levee, commissioner fixing amount to be retained by county, §69-4-108.

4-3-1903. Powers and duties.

The commissioner is vested with power to prescribe rules and regulations not inconsistent with law and prepare such forms as the commissioner may deem proper for the administration of the duties of the commissioner's office.

The department of revenue has the power to:

Administer the assessment and collection of all state taxes except those for which responsibility is expressly conferred by statute upon some other officer or agency;

Administer the assessment and collection of privilege taxes;

Receive state revenues collected by county officials and make and retain records of same;

Investigate the tax systems of other states, and formulate and recommend to the governor such legislation as may be deemed expedient to prevent evasion of taxes, to secure just and equitable taxation and to improve the system of taxation in the state;

Examine, at any and all times, the accounts of any private corporation, institution, association or board receiving appropriations from the general assembly;

Require a complete record of the officers, assistants and employees appointed by the commissioners of the various departments, and require the salaries of the same to be in conformity with the scale authorized; and

Procure from any department or agency of the state, or any of its political subdivisions, a copy of the complete record maintained by it of any convictions for violation of any criminal laws by any person who has made application to the department for employment, for the exclusive use of the department in screening the applicant to determine suitability for an appointment therein.

Acts 1921, ch. 113, § 2; 1923, ch. 7, §§ 12, 19; 1923, ch. 106, § 1; Shan. Supp., §§ 373a44, 373a56, 809a8; Code 1932, §§ 269, 1478; Acts 1933, ch. 92, § 1; 1937, ch. 33, §§ 50, 51; 1937, ch. 291, § 1; 1945, ch. 57, § 1; 1947, ch. 17, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.50, 255.51 (Williams, §§ 255.53, 255.54, 269); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1965, ch. 5, § 1; 1965, ch. 154, § 1; 1970, ch. 500, § 2; 1970, ch. 559, § 4; 1973, ch. 151, § 1; 1973, ch. 368, § 1; 1973, ch. 373, § 1; 1977, ch. 106, § 1; 1978, ch. 531, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 4-305, 4-306; Acts 1978, ch. 599, § 1; 1980, ch. 460, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 67-101(1).

Cross-References. General organization, powers and duties of department, title 67, ch. 1, part 1.